Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5108.
people of the state of michigan enact: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 Sec. 5111. (1) In carrying out its authority under this article, the department shall maintain a list of reportable diseases, infections, and disabilities that designates and classifies communicable, serious communicable, chronic, or noncommunicable diseases, infections, and disabilities. The department shall review and revise the list under this subsection at least annually. (2) In Subject to subsection (4), in carrying out its authority under this article, the department may promulgate rules to do any of the following: (a) Establish requirements for reporting and other surveillance methods for measuring the occurrence of diseases, infections, and disabilities and the potential for epidemics. Rules promulgated under this subdivision may require a licensed health professional or health facility to submit to the department or a local health department, on a form provided by the department, a report of the occurrence of a communicable disease, serious communicable disease or infection, or disability. The rules promulgated under this subdivision may require a report to be submitted to the department not more than 24 hours after a licensed health professional or health facility determines that an individual has a serious communicable disease or infection. (b) Investigate cases, epidemics, and unusual occurrences of diseases, infections, and situations with a potential for causing diseases. (c) Establish procedures for controlling diseases and infections, including, but not limited to, immunization and 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 environmental controls. (d) Establish procedures for preventing, detecting, and treating disabilities and rehabilitating individuals suffering from disabilities or disease, including nutritional problems. (e) Establish procedures for controlling rabies and the disposition of nonhuman agents carrying disease, including rabid animals. (f) Establish procedures for reporting known or suspected cases of lead poisoning or undue lead body burden. (g) Designate communicable diseases or serious communicable diseases or infections for which local health departments are required to furnish care, including, but not limited to, tuberculosis and sexually transmitted infection. (h) Implement this part and parts 52 and 53, including, but not limited to, rules for discovering, caring for, and reporting an individual having or suspected of having a communicable disease or a serious communicable disease or infection, and establishing approved tests under section 5123 and approved prophylaxes under section 5125. (3) The department shall promulgate rules providing for the confidentiality of reports, records, and data pertaining to testing, care, treatment, reporting, and research associated with communicable diseases and serious communicable diseases or infections. (4) Beginning on the effective date of the amendatory act that amended section 17724a, a pharmacist administering a qualified laboratory test in accordance with section 17724a shall report the occurrence of a disease, infection, or disability in the same manner as required for other licensed health professionals under 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 subsection (2). As used in this subsection, "pharmacist" means that term as defined in section 17707. Sec. 17703. (1) "Deliver" or "delivery" means the actual, constructive, or attempted transfer of a drug or device from 1 person to another. (2) "Device" means an instrument, apparatus, or contrivance, including its components, parts, and accessories, intended for use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment, or prevention of disease in human beings or other animals, or to affect the structure or function of the body of human beings or other animals. (3) "Dispense" means the preparation, compounding, packaging, or labeling of a drug pursuant to any of the following: (a) A prescription. (b) An authorization issued by a prescriber. (c) Section 17724a or 17744f. (4) "Dispensing prescriber" means a prescriber, other than a veterinarian, who dispenses prescription drugs. (5) Except as otherwise provided in section 17780, "distribute" or "distribution" means to sell, offer for sale, deliver, offer to deliver, broker, give away, or transfer a drug, whether by passage of title or physical movement. The term does not include any of the following: (a) Dispensing or administering a drug. (b) The delivery of a drug, or offering to deliver a drug, by a common carrier in the usual course of business as a common carrier. (c) The delivery of a drug via an automated device under section 17760. (6) "Drug" means any of the following: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (a) A substance recognized or for which the standards or specifications are prescribed in the official compendium. (b) A substance intended for use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment, or prevention of disease in human beings or other animals. (c) A substance, other than food, intended to affect the structure or a function of the body of human beings or other animals. (d) A substance intended for use as a component of a substance specified in subdivision (a), (b), or (c), but not including a device or its components, parts, or accessories. (7) "Electronic signature" means an electronic sound, symbol, or process attached to or logically associated with a record and executed or adopted by a person with the intent to sign the record. (8) "Electronically transmitted prescription" means the communication of an original prescription or refill authorization by electronic means including computer to computer, computer to facsimile machine, or email transmission that contains the same information it contained when the prescriber or the prescriber's agent transmitted the prescription. Electronically transmitted prescription does not include a prescription or refill authorization transmitted by telephone or facsimile machine. (9) "Emergency contraceptive" means a drug approved by the FDA to prevent pregnancy as soon as possible following unprotected sexual intercourse or a known or suspected contraceptive failure. Sec. 17707. (1) "Parent pharmacy" means a pharmacy that operates a remote pharmacy through a telepharmacy system. (2) "Personal charge" means the immediate physical presence of a pharmacist or dispensing prescriber. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (3) "Pharmacist" means an individual who is licensed under this article to engage in the practice of pharmacy. (4) "Pharmacist in charge" or "PIC" means the pharmacist who is designated by a pharmacy, manufacturer, wholesale distributor, or wholesale distributor-broker as its pharmacist in charge under section 17748(2). (5) "Pharmacist intern" or "intern" means an individual who satisfactorily completes the requirements set forth in rules promulgated by the department in consultation with the board and is licensed by the board for the purpose of obtaining instruction in the practice of pharmacy from a preceptor approved by the board. (6) "Pharmacy" means a facility or part of a facility that is licensed under this part to dispense prescription drugs or prepare prescription drugs for delivery or distribution. Pharmacy does not include the office of a dispensing prescriber or an automated device. For the purpose of a duty placed on a pharmacy under this part, "pharmacy" means the person to which the pharmacy license is issued, unless otherwise specifically provided. (7) "Pharmacy technician" means an individual who is required to hold a health profession subfield license under this part to serve as a pharmacy technician. (8) "Practice of pharmacy" means a health service, the clinical application of which includes the encouragement of safety and efficacy in the prescribing, dispensing, administering, and use of drugs and related articles for the prevention of illness, and the maintenance and management of health. Practice of pharmacy includes the direct or indirect provision of professional functions and services associated with the practice of pharmacy. Professional functions associated with the practice of pharmacy include the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 following: (a) The interpretation and evaluation of the prescription. (b) Drug product selection. (c) The compounding, dispensing, safe storage, and distribution of drugs and devices. (d) The maintenance of legally required records. (e) Advising the prescriber and the patient as required as to contents, therapeutic action, utilization, and possible adverse reactions or interactions of drugs. (f) Ordering and administering qualified immunizing agents in accordance with section 17724. (g) Ordering, and administering, and interpreting the results of qualified laboratory tests in accordance with section 17724a. (h) Issuing prescriptions for hormonal contraceptive patches, self-administered hormonal contraceptives, emergency contraceptives, and vaginal ring hormonal contraceptives in accordance with section 17744g. (i) Issuing prescriptions for auto-injectable epinephrine in accordance with section 17744a. (j) Issuing prescriptions for prescription drugs and devices in accordance with section 17744h. Sec. 17708. (1) "Preceptor" means a pharmacist approved by the board to direct the training of an intern in an approved pharmacy. (2) "Prescriber" means a licensed dentist; a licensed doctor of medicine; a licensed doctor of osteopathic medicine and surgery; a licensed doctor of podiatric medicine and surgery; a licensed physician's assistant; subject to part 174, a licensed optometrist; subject to section 17211a, an advanced practice registered nurse; a licensed veterinarian; subject to subsection (7), a registered 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 professional nurse who holds a specialty certification as a nurse anesthetist under section 17210 when engaging in the practice of nursing and providing the anesthesia and analgesia services described in section 17210(3); or any other licensed health professional acting under the delegation and using, recording, or otherwise indicating the name of the delegating licensed doctor of medicine or licensed doctor of osteopathic medicine and surgery. As used in this subsection: (a) "Advanced practice registered nurse" means that term as defined in section 17201 and includes a licensed advanced practice registered nurse. (b) "License" means that term as defined in section 16106 and includes an authorization issued under the laws of another state or province of Canada to practice a profession described in this subsection in that state or province of Canada where practice would otherwise be unlawful. (3) "Prescription" means an order by a prescriber to fill, compound, or dispense a drug or device written and signed; written or created in an electronic format, signed, and transmitted by facsimile; or transmitted electronically or by other means of communication. An order transmitted in other than written or hard-copy form must be electronically recorded, printed, or written and immediately dated by the pharmacist, and that record is considered the original prescription. In a health facility or agency licensed under article 17 or other medical institution, an order for a drug or device in the patient's chart is considered for the purposes of this definition the original prescription. For purposes of this part, prescription also includes a standing order issued under section 17744e; and an order issued by a pharmacist under section 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 17744g to dispense a hormonal contraceptive patch, a self-administered hormonal contraceptive, an emergency contraceptive, or a vaginal ring hormonal contraceptive; issued by a pharmacist under section 17744g. and an order issued by a pharmacist under sections 17744a and 17744h to dispense drugs or devices. Subject to section 17751(2) and (5), prescription includes, but is not limited to, an order for a drug, not including a controlled substance except under circumstances described in section 17763(e), written and signed; written or created in an electronic format, signed, and transmitted by facsimile; or transmitted electronically or by other means of communication by a prescriber in another state or province of Canada. (4) Subject to subsection (5), "prescription drug" means a drug to which 1 or more of the following apply: (a) The drug is dispensed pursuant to a prescription. (b) The drug bears the federal legend "CAUTION: federal law prohibits dispensing without prescription" or "Rx only". (c) The drug is designated by the board as a drug that may only be dispensed pursuant to a prescription. (5) For purposes of this part, prescription drug also includes a drug dispensed pursuant to section 17724a or 17744f. (6) "Remote pharmacy" means a pharmacy described in sections 17742a and 17742b. (7) The authority of a registered professional nurse who holds a specialty certification as a nurse anesthetist under section 17210 to prescribe pharmacological agents is limited to pharmacological agents for administration to patients as described in section 17210(3)(b), (c), or (d). Subsection (2) does not require new or additional third party third-party reimbursement or 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 mandated worker's compensation benefits for anesthesia and analgesia services provided under section 17210(3) by a registered professional nurse who holds a specialty certification as a nurse anesthetist under section 17210. Sec. 17724a. (1) Subject to this section, a pharmacist may order a qualified laboratory test for and administer the qualified laboratory test to an individual if the qualified laboratory test meets all of the following requirements: (a) The qualified laboratory test is classified as waived by the Food and Drug Administration. (b) The qualified laboratory test requires only the use of a specimen collected by a nasal or throat swab or a finger prick. (c) The qualified laboratory test is used to detect or screen for any of the following: (i) COVID-19. (ii) Influenza. (iii) A respiratory infection.Respiratory syncytial virus. (iv) Streptococcal tonsilitis and pharyngitis. (v) The absence of HIV as shown by a negative antigen and antibody test. (vi) Hepatitis C virus. (vii) Any other condition as authorized by a rule promulgated under this section. (2) Before ordering or administering a qualified laboratory test under this section, a pharmacist shall successfully complete the training program approved under subsection (5). (3) Before ordering or administering a qualified laboratory test for streptococcal tonsilitis and pharyngitis for an individual under this section, a pharmacist shall use the Centor criteria to 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 determine whether the administration of the qualified laboratory test for streptococcal tonsilitis and pharyngitis is appropriate for the individual. (4) (3) A pharmacist who orders a qualified laboratory test for or administers a qualified laboratory test to an individual under this section shall advise the individual of the test result and refer the individual to a physician, or another health professional, designated by the individual.the individual's primary care physician or, if the individual does not have a primary care physician, to another licensed health professional that the pharmacist considers appropriate. (4) A pharmacist who orders a qualified laboratory test for and administers that qualified laboratory test to an individual under this section for purposes of detecting or screening for COVID-19 or influenza may, without a prescription, dispense a drug to the individual if all of the following are met: (a) The pharmacist determines that the drug is needed to treat the individual for COVID-19 or influenza based on the individual's test result. (b) The drug is an antiviral drug and is available at the pharmacy. (c) The drug is provided pursuant to protocols established by the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention or public health guidelines established by the department of health and human services. (d) The pharmacist complies with subsection (3) and any other requirement established by rule under this section. (5) The department, in consultation with the board, shall promulgate rules to implement this section. The rules must require 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 the training program required under this section to require a pharmacist to demonstrate sufficient knowledge of how both of the following: (a) How to administer and interpret the result of each qualified laboratory test that the pharmacist may order or administer under this section. and to demonstrate sufficient knowledge of each illness, condition, or disease described in subsection (1) for which the pharmacist provides treatment based on the results of a qualified laboratory test. (b) The Centor criteria. (6) This section does not prohibit a pharmacist from doing any of the following: (a) Ordering or administering a laboratory test as a delegated act of a physician or another health professional under section 16215. (b) Ordering or administering a laboratory test pursuant to federal law or an emergency order. (c) Dispensing a drug to a patient without a prescription pursuant to federal law or an emergency order. (7) As used in this section: , "qualified (a) "HIV" means that term as defined in section 5101. (b) "Qualified laboratory test" means a laboratory test meeting the requirements described in subsection (1). Sec. 17744. (1) A prescriber may designate an agent to act on behalf of or at the discretion of that prescriber. A designation of an agent by a prescriber under this section is not required to be in writing to be a valid designation. If a designation of an agent by a prescriber under this section is contained in a written document, the prescriber or the agent may transmit that document to 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 a pharmacy that will dispense a prescription issued by that prescriber. (2) Except as otherwise provided in this part, only a prescriber who is acting within the scope of the prescriber's practice may issue a prescription. An agent may prepare and transmit a prescription that has been signed by the prescriber, including a signature that meets the requirements of section 17754 or 17754a. The prescriber issuing a prescription and the pharmacist issuing a prescription in accordance with this part or dispensing a drug or device under a prescription is are responsible for all of the requirements of state and federal law, rules, and regulations regarding the issuance of prescriptions and dispensing of drugs or devices under prescriptions. (3) A prescriber or the prescriber's agent may transmit to a pharmacy a prescription that is contained within a patient's chart in a health facility or agency licensed under article 17 or other medical institution. A prescription that is contained within a patient's chart in a health facility or agency licensed under article 17 or other medical institution and that is created in an electronic format may contain more than 6 prescriptions and may contain prescriptions for schedule 3 to 5 controlled substances and noncontrolled substances on the same form. Sec. 17744a. (1) Notwithstanding any provision of this act to the contrary, a prescriber or pharmacist may issue a prescription for and a dispensing prescriber or pharmacist may dispense auto-injectable epinephrine to an authorized entity. When issuing a prescription for or dispensing auto-injectable epinephrine to an authorized entity as authorized under this section, the prescriber, dispensing prescriber, or pharmacist, as appropriate, shall insert 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 the name of the authorized entity as the name of the patient. (2) A school employee who is a licensed registered professional nurse or who is trained in the administration of an epinephrine auto-injector under section 1179a of the revised school code, 1976 PA 451, MCL 380.1179a, may possess and administer an epinephrine auto-injector dispensed to a school board under this section. (3) An authorized entity as defined in subsection (6)(b) may acquire and stock a supply of auto-injectable epinephrine under a prescription as authorized in this section. An authorized entity as defined in subsection (6)(b) that acquires and stocks a supply of auto-injectable epinephrine is subject to section 17744d. (4) A law enforcement officer or firefighter of an authorized entity as defined in subsection (6)(c) may, subject to section 2 of the law enforcement and firefighter access to epinephrine act, 2020 PA 312, MCL 28.822, possess and administer auto-injectable epinephrine dispensed to the entity under this section. (5) A prescriber An individual who issues a prescription for or a dispensing prescriber or pharmacist who dispenses auto-injectable epinephrine to an authorized entity as authorized under this section is not liable in a civil action for a properly stored and dispensed epinephrine auto-injector that was a proximate cause of injury or death to an individual due to the administration of or failure to administer the epinephrine auto-injector. (6) As used in this section, "authorized entity" means any of the following: (a) A school board for the purpose of meeting the requirements of section 1179a of the revised school code, 1976 PA 451, MCL 380.1179a. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (b) A person or governmental entity that operates or conducts a business or activity at which allergens capable of causing anaphylaxis may be present, including, but not limited to, a recreation camp, youth sports league, amusement park, nonpublic school, religious institution, or sports arena. (c) An eligible entity authorized to purchase, possess, and distribute auto-injectable epinephrine under the law enforcement and firefighter access to epinephrine act, 2020 PA 312, MCL 28.821 to 28.823. Sec. 17744h. (1) Pursuant to rules promulgated under this section and except as otherwise provided in subsection (3), a pharmacist may issue a prescription for and dispense to an individual any of the following: (a) A prescription drug that is an antibiotic to treat streptococcal tonsilitis and pharyngitis, if the individual was administered a qualified laboratory test under section 17724a at the pharmacy for streptococcal tonsilitis and pharyngitis and the pharmacist obtained a positive test result for streptococcal tonsilitis and pharyngitis from the individual. (b) A prescription drug that is an antiviral to treat COVID-19 or influenza, if the individual was administered a qualified laboratory test under section 17724a at the pharmacy for COVID-19 or influenza and the pharmacist obtained a positive test result for COVID-19 or influenza from the individual. (c) A prescription drug approved by the FDA for tobacco cessation if all of the following requirements are met: (i) The individual is not considered to be high risk, the prescription drug is not considered to be contraindicated, and the individual does not meet any other condition established by rule 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 that would render the individual ineligible for receiving the prescription drug, based on screening conducted by the pharmacist under this section. (ii) On issuing the prescription for and dispensing the prescription drug to the individual, the pharmacist refers the individual to the individual's primary care physician or, if the individual does not have a primary care physician, to another licensed health professional that the pharmacist considers appropriate, for a follow-up consultation. (iii) The pharmacist complies with any other requirement established by rule, including, but not limited to, a requirement that the pharmacist successfully complete a training course on tobacco cessation products before issuing a prescription described in this subdivision. (d) A prescription drug approved by the FDA to treat either of the following conditions: (i) Lice, if the prescription drug is in the form of a topical treatment. (ii) Herpes skin lesions, if the prescription drug is for the acute treatment of the virus. (e) Any of the following devices: (i) An inhalation spacer. (ii) A nebulizer. (iii) A blood sugar testing device for diabetes. (iv) A syringe. (f) A travel drug, if the pharmacist successfully completes a course on travel medicine, the travel drug is indicated for the individual's intended destination of travel, and the travel drug is dispensed in an amount limited to a 3-month supply or less. On 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 issuing the prescription for and dispensing the travel drug to the individual, the pharmacist shall refer the individual to the individual's primary care physician or, if the individual does not have a primary care physician, to another licensed health professional that the pharmacist considers appropriate, for a follow-up consultation. If a pharmacist issues a prescription for a travel drug under this subdivision, the pharmacist shall advise the individual on a qualified immunizing agent recommended for the individual's intended destination of travel based on guidelines from the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention and the pharmacist may administer the qualified immunizing agent to the individual in accordance with section 17724. (g) A prescription drug or device, other than a drug or device described in section 17744f, for which the rules promulgated under this section specifically authorize a pharmacist to issue a prescription. The rules must require that a drug or device prescribed under this subdivision be prescribed in accordance with the FDA's approved labeling for the drug or device. A drug or device prescribed under this subdivision is limited to a prescription drug or device to treat a condition that meets any of the following requirements: (i) The condition does not require a new diagnosis. (ii) The condition is minor and generally self-limiting. (iii) In the professional judgment of the pharmacist, the condition threatens the health or safety of the individual if the prescription drug or device is not immediately dispensed. The pharmacist shall only dispense a prescription drug or device for a condition described under this subparagraph in the minimum quantity necessary until the patient is able to be seen by a physician or 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 another health professional. (2) If a pharmacist, in the pharmacist's professional judgment, believes that an individual's symptoms require symptomatic management for an upper respiratory illness, the pharmacist may recommend a product that is available over the counter to the individual. (3) A pharmacist shall not issue a prescription for or dispense a controlled substance under this section or a rule promulgated under this section. (4) The department, in consultation with the board, shall promulgate rules to implement this section. The rules must include at least all of the following for the dispensing of a prescription drug approved by the FDA for tobacco cessation under this section: (a) Standard screening procedures that are based on clinical practice guidelines for determining whether an individual is considered high risk, whether the prescription drug is contraindicated, or whether the individual meets a condition described in subdivision (b). (b) The conditions under which an individual is ineligible to receive the prescription drug and must instead be referred to the individual's primary care physician or, if the individual does not have a primary care physician, to another licensed health professional that the pharmacist considers appropriate, or to a tobacco treatment specialist. (c) Standards for recommending that an individual who receives the prescription drug receive additional assistance for tobacco cessation, including, but not limited to, counseling or other evidence-based tobacco cessation interventions. (5) This section does not prohibit a pharmacist from 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 dispensing a drug to a patient without a prescription pursuant to federal law or an emergency order. (6) As used in this section: (a) "COVID-19" means severe acute respiratory syndrome coronavirus 2 (SARS-CoV-2). (b) "Michigan care improvement registry" means the Michigan care improvement registry established under section 9207. (c) "Qualified immunizing agent" means that term as defined in section 17724. (d) "Travel drug" means a prescription drug that is recommended for an individual who is traveling outside of the United States as set forth in the "Health Information for International Travel", a publication by the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention that is commonly referred to as the "Yellow Book". Sec. 17751. (1) Except as otherwise provided in sections 17724a and section 17744f, a pharmacist shall not dispense a drug requiring a prescription under the federal act or a law of this state except under authority of an original prescription or an equivalent record of an original prescription approved by the board. A pharmacist described in section 17742b(2) may dispense a drug pursuant to an original prescription received at a remote pharmacy if the pharmacist receives, reviews, and verifies an exact digital image of the prescription received at the remote pharmacy before the drug is dispensed at the remote pharmacy. (2) Subject to this subsection and subsections (1) and (5), a pharmacist may dispense a drug or device pursuant to a prescription written and signed; written or created in an electronic format, signed, and transmitted by facsimile; or transmitted electronically 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 or by other means of communication by a prescriber in another state or province of Canada, but not including a prescription for a controlled substance except under circumstances described in section 17763(e). Before dispensing a drug or device pursuant to a prescription under this subsection, the pharmacist, in the exercise of the pharmacist's professional judgment, must determine all of the following: (a) Except as otherwise authorized under section 5110, 17744a, or 17744b, if the prescriber is not a veterinarian, that the prescription was issued pursuant to an existing prescriber-patient relationship. (b) That the prescription is authentic. (c) That the prescribed drug is appropriate and necessary for the treatment of an acute, chronic, or recurrent condition. (3) A pharmacist or a prescriber shall dispense a drug or device pursuant to a prescription only if the prescription falls within the scope of practice of the prescriber or if the prescription was issued by a pharmacist in accordance with this part. (4) A pharmacist shall not knowingly dispense a drug or device must not be knowingly dispensed pursuant to a prescription after the death of the patient. (5) A pharmacist shall not dispense a drug or device pursuant to a prescription transmitted by facsimile or created in electronic format and printed out for use by the patient unless the document is manually signed by the prescriber. This subsection does not apply to any of the following: (a) A prescription that is transmitted by a computer to a facsimile machine if that prescription complies with section 17754 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 or 17754a. (b) A prescription that is received by a remote pharmacy and made available to a pharmacist described in section 17742b(2) for review and verification in the manner required under subsection (1). (6) After consultation with and agreement from the prescriber, a pharmacist may add or change a patient's address, a dosage form, a drug strength, a drug quantity, a direction for use, or an issue date with regard to a prescription. A pharmacist shall note the details of the consultation and agreement required under this subsection on the prescription or, if the drug is dispensed at a remote pharmacy, on the digital image of the prescription described in subsection (1), and shall maintain that documentation with the prescription as required in section 17752. A pharmacist shall not change the patient's name, controlled substance prescribed unless authorized to dispense a lower cost generically equivalent drug product under section 17755, or the prescriber's signature with regard to a prescription. (7) A prescription that is contained within a patient's chart in a health facility or agency licensed under article 17 or other medical institution and that is transmitted to a pharmacy under section 17744 is the original prescription. If all other requirements of this part are met, a pharmacist shall dispense a drug or device pursuant to a prescription described in this subsection. A pharmacist may dispense a drug or device pursuant to a prescription described in this subsection even if the prescription does not contain the quantity ordered. If a prescription described in this subsection does not contain the quantity ordered, the pharmacist shall consult with the prescriber 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 to determine an agreed-upon quantity. The pharmacist shall record the quantity dispensed on the prescription and shall maintain that documentation with the prescription as required in section 17752. (8) If, after consulting with a patient, a pharmacist determines in the exercise of the pharmacist's professional judgment that dispensing additional quantities of a prescription drug is appropriate for the patient, the pharmacist may dispense, at one time, additional quantities of the prescription drug up to the total number of dosage units authorized by the prescriber on the original prescription for the patient and any refills of the prescription. Except for a controlled substance included in schedule 5 that does not contain an opioid, this subsection does not apply to a prescription for a controlled substance. (9) Notwithstanding any provision of this section, a pharmacist who receives a prescription under subsection (2) from an advanced practice registered nurse prescriber or physician's assistant prescriber in another state or province of Canada may dispense the drug or device without determining whether the advanced practice registered nurse prescriber or physician's assistant prescriber is authorized under the laws of the other state or province of Canada to issue the prescription. Sec. 17757. (1) When a pharmacist engaged in the business of selling drugs receives a prescription, the pharmacist may, or, when the pharmacist receives a request made in person or by telephone, the pharmacist shall provide the current selling price of a drug dispensed by that pharmacy or comparative current selling prices of generic and brand name drugs or biosimilar drug products dispensed by that pharmacy. If information is provided under this subsection, it must be provided before a drug is dispensed. A person that makes 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 a request for or receives price information under this subsection is not obligated to purchase the drug for which the price or comparative prices are requested or received. A pharmacy or a pharmacist described in this subsection shall not enter into a contract that prohibits the disclosure of the information described in this subsection. (2) A pharmacist engaged in the business of selling drugs shall conspicuously display the notice described in subsection (3) at each counter over which prescription drugs are dispensed. (3) The notice required under subsection (2) must be in substantially the following form: NOTICE TO CONSUMERS ABOUT PRESCRIPTION DRUGS Under Michigan law, you have the right to find out the price of a prescription drug before the pharmacist fills the prescription. You are under no obligation to have the prescription filled here and may use this price information to shop around at other pharmacies. You may request price information in person or by telephone. Every pharmacy has the current selling prices of both generic and brand name drugs dispensed by the pharmacy. Ask your pharmacist if a lower-cost generic drug is available to fill your prescription. A generic drug contains the same medicine as a brand name drug and is a suitable substitute in most instances. A generic drug may not be dispensed by your pharmacist if your doctor has written "dispense as written" or the initials "d.a.w." on the prescription. If you have questions about the drugs that have been 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 prescribed for you, ask your doctor or pharmacist for more information. To avoid dangerous drug interactions, let your doctor and pharmacist know about any other medications you are taking. This is especially important if you have more than 1 doctor or have prescriptions filled at more than 1 pharmacy. (4) The notice required under subsection (2) must also contain the address and phone number of the board and the department. The text of the notice must be in at least 32-point bold type and be printed on paper at least 11 inches by 17 inches in size. The notice may be printed on multiple pages. (5) The department shall provide a copy of the notice required under subsection (2) to each licensee. The department shall provide additional copies if needed. A person may duplicate or reproduce the notice if the duplication or reproduction is a true copy of the notice as produced by the department, without any additions or deletions. (6) The pharmacist shall furnish to the purchaser of a prescription drug at the time the drug is delivered to the purchaser a receipt evidencing the transactions that contains all of the following: (a) The brand name of the drug, if applicable. (b) The name of the manufacturer or the supplier of the drug, if the drug does not have a brand name. (c) The strength of the drug, if significant. (d) The quantity dispensed, if applicable. (e) The name and address of the pharmacy. (f) The serial number of the prescription, a reference to the standing order issued under section 17744e, or, if the prescription 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 drug is dispensed pursuant to section 17724a or 17744f, a reference to the applicable that section. (g) The date the prescription was originally dispensed, if applicable. (h) The name of the prescriber or, if prescribed under the prescriber's delegatory authority, the name of the delegatee. If the prescription drug is dispensed pursuant to section 17744f, the name of the original prescriber and the pharmacist dispensing the prescription drug. If the prescription drug is dispensed pursuant to section 17724a, a prescription issued by a pharmacist under section 17744a, 17744g, or 17744h, the name of the pharmacist dispensing the prescription drug. If the prescription was issued under section 17744g, the name of the pharmacist issuing the prescription. (i) Except as otherwise authorized under section 5110, 17744a, 17744b, or 17744e, the name of the patient for whom the drug was prescribed or dispensed. (j) The price for which the drug was sold to the purchaser. (7) The items required under subsection (6)(a), (b), and (c) may be omitted from a receipt by a pharmacist only if the omission is expressly required by the prescriber. The pharmacist shall retain a copy of each receipt furnished under subsection (6) for 90 days. Including the items required under subsection (6) on the prescription container label is a valid receipt to the purchaser. Including the items required under subsection (6) on the written prescription form and retaining the form constitutes retention of a copy of the receipt. (8) The department, in consultation with the board, may promulgate rules to implement this section. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Sec. 17763. In addition to the grounds set forth in part 161, the disciplinary subcommittee may fine, reprimand, or place a pharmacist licensee on probation, or deny, limit, suspend, or revoke the license of a pharmacist or order restitution or community service for a violation or abetting in a violation of this part or rules promulgated under this part, or for 1 or more of the following grounds: (a) Permitting the dispensing of prescriptions by an individual who is not a pharmacist, pharmacist intern, or dispensing prescriber. (b) Permitting the dispensing of prescriptions by a pharmacist intern, except in the presence and under the personal charge of a pharmacist. (c) Selling at auction drugs in bulk or in open packages unless the sale has been approved in accordance with rules of the board. (d) Promoting a prescription drug to the public in any manner. (e) In addition to the prohibition contained in section 7405(1)(e), dispensing a prescription for a controlled substance as defined in section 7104 that is written and signed; written or created in an electronic format, signed, and transmitted by facsimile; or transmitted electronically or by other means of communication by a physician prescriber, dentist prescriber, or veterinarian prescriber in another state, unless the prescription is issued by a physician prescriber, dentist prescriber, or veterinarian prescriber who is authorized under the laws of that state to practice dentistry, medicine, osteopathic medicine and surgery, or veterinary medicine and to prescribe controlled substances. 1 2 (f) Delegating the prescribing of a prescription drug or device under section 17744a or 17744h.